Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-15] Publication
of election notice. (a) As soon as
practicable before an election, an official in each jurisdiction charged
with printing ballots and balloting material shall
prepare an election notice for that jurisdiction, to be used in conjunction
with a federal write-in absentee ballot. The election notice must contain a
list of all of the ballot measures and federal, state, and local offices that
as of that date the official expects to be on the ballot on the date of the election.
The notice may contain specific instructions for how a voter is to indicate on
the federal write-in absentee ballot the voter's choice for each office to be
filled and for each ballot measure to be contested.

(b) A covered voter
may request a copy of an election notice. The official charged with preparing
the election notice shall send the notice to the voter by facsimile, electronic
mail, or regular mail, as the voter requests.

(c) As soon as
ballot styles are finalized pursuant to section 11-119, and no later than the
date ballots are required to be transmitted to voters under section
15-4, the official charged with preparing the election notice under subsection
(a) shall update the notice with the certified candidates for each office and
ballot measure questions and make the updated notice publicly available.

(d) A local
election jurisdiction that maintains an internet website shall make the
election notice prepared under subsection (a) and updated versions of the
election notice regularly available on the website.

(e) The chief election officer or clerk in the
case of county elections may satisfy the requirements of this section by making
available ballot facsimiles or a certified list of candidates and ballot
measures available on their respective websites. [L 2012, c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next